Mississippi statutes. Title 91. Trusts and Estates
Article 11. Miscellaneous Provisions.

§ 91-8-1101.
Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing this chapter, consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 91, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 91-8-1102.
Electronic records and signatures.

The provisions of this chapter governing the legal effect, validity, or enforceability of electronic records or electronic signatures, and of contracts formed or performed with the use of such records or signatures, conform to the requirements of Section 102 of the Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act (15 USC Section 7002) and supersede, modify, and limit the requirements of the Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 92, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 91-8-1103.
Severability clause.

If any provision of this chapter or its application to any person or circumstances is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are severable.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 93, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§§ 91-8-1104 and 91-8-1105.
[Reserved].

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter:

This chapter applies to all trusts created before, on, or after July 1, 2014;

This chapter applies to all judicial proceedings concerning trusts commenced on or after July 1, 2014;

This chapter applies to judicial proceedings concerning trusts commenced before July 1, 2014, unless the court finds that application of a particular provision of this chapter would substantially interfere with the effective conduct of the judicial proceedings or prejudice the rights of the parties, in which case the particular provision of this chapter does not apply and the superseded law applies;

Any rule of construction or presumption provided in this chapter applies to trust instruments executed before July 1, 2014, unless there is a clear indication of a contrary intent in the terms of the trust; and

An act done before July 1, 2014, is not affected by this chapter.

If a right is acquired, extinguished, or barred upon the expiration of a prescribed period that has commenced to run under any other statute before July 1, 2014, that statute continues to apply to the right even if it has been repealed or superseded.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 94, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 91-8-1107.
Alter ego.

Absent clear and convincing evidence, no settlor of an irrevocable trust may be deemed to be the alter ego of a trustee of such trust.

None of the following factors, by themselves or in combination, may be considered sufficient evidence for a court to conclude that the settlor controls a trustee, or is the alter ego of a trustee of such trust:

Any combination of the factors listed in Section 91-8-1108 regarding dominion and control over a trust;

Isolated occurrences where the settlor has signed checks, made disbursements, or executed other documents related to the trust as a trustee, a trust advisor or a trust protector, when in fact the settlor was not a trustee, trust advisor or trust protector;

Making any requests for distributions on behalf of beneficiaries; or

Making any requests to the trustee to hold, purchase, or sell any trust property.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 95, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 91-8-1108.
Dominion and control over a trust.

In the event a person challenges a settlor’s or a beneficiary’s influence over a trust, none of the following factors, alone or in combination, shall enter into a determination that dominion and control over a trust exists:

The settlor or a beneficiary is serving as a trustee, a trust advisor, a trust protector, or other fiduciary as described in this Title 91;

The settlor or a beneficiary holds an unrestricted power to remove or replace a trustee, a trust advisor, a trust protector, or other fiduciary;

The settlor or a beneficiary is a trust administrator, a general partner of a partnership, a manager of a limited liability company, an officer of a corporation, or holds any other managerial function relative to any type of entity specified in this section, or relative to any other type of entity not so specified, and part or all of the trust property consists of an interest in such entity;

A person related by blood or adoption to the settlor or a beneficiary is appointed as a trustee, a trust advisor, a trust protector, or other fiduciary;

The settlor’s or a beneficiary’s agent, accountant, attorney, financial advisor, or friend is appointed as a trustee, a trust advisor, a trust protector, or other fiduciary;

A business associate is appointed as a trustee, a trust advisor, a trust protector, or other fiduciary;

A beneficiary holds any power of appointment over any or all of the trust property;

The settlor holds a power to substitute property of equivalent value for property held by the trust, regardless of whether such power is:

Held in a fiduciary or nonfiduciary capacity;

Exercisable with or without the approval of any person in a fiduciary capacity; or

Exercisable with or without the approval of any person having an interest adverse to such settlor;

A trustee, a trust advisor, a trust protector or other fiduciary has the power to loan trust property to the settlor for less than a full and adequate rate of interest or without adequate security;

Any language relative to the power to make any distribution provides for any discretion relative to such distribution;

The trust has only one (1) beneficiary eligible for current distributions; or

The beneficiary is serving as a cotrustee, or as a trust advisor or trust protector under Article 12, or as any other fiduciary.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 96, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 91-8-1109.
Protection of special needs trusts and other similar trusts for disabled persons.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this chapter that may otherwise be applicable to a trust, no provision thereof shall apply to any special needs trust, supplemental needs trust, or other similar trust established for a person with a disability as a beneficiary, including, without limitation, any trust established pursuant to the provisions of 42 USC Section 1396(p)(d)(4)A or C, as amended from time to time, or other similar federal or state statute, to the extent that the provision would disqualify the trust beneficiary at any time from eligibility for public needs-based assistance benefits for which the beneficiary would otherwise qualify.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 97, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 91-8-1106.
Application to existing relationships.